src/smn-lex.txt
LEXICON NEG
+Prs+Sg1:jiem K ;
+Prs+Sg2:jieh K ;
+Prs+Sg3:ij K ;
+Prs+Du1:iän K ;
+Prs+Du1:eän K ;
+Prs+Du2:eppee K ;
+Prs+Du3:iävá K ;
+Prs+Du3:eävá K ;
+Prs+Pl1:ep K ;
+Prs+Pl2:eppeđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:iä K ;
+Prs+Pl3:eävá K ;

+Imprt+Sg1:iällum  K ;
+Imprt+Sg1:eällum  K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:ele K ;
+Imprt+Sg3:iällus K ;
+Imprt+Sg3:eällus K ;
+Imprt+Du1:iälloon K ;
+Imprt+Du1:eälloon K ;
+Imprt+Du2:ellee K ;
+Imprt+Du3:iällus K ;
+Imprt+Du3:eällus K ;
+Imprt+Pl1:iällup K ;
+Imprt+Pl1:eällup K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:elleđ K ;
+Imprt+Pl3:iällus K ;
+Imprt+Pl3:eällus K ;

+Opt+Sg2:eälu K ;
+Opt+Sg2:iälu K ;
+Opt+Du2:eällu K ;
+Opt+Du2:iällu K ;
+Opt+Pl2:eälluđ K ;
+Opt+Pl2:iälluđ K ;

+Sup:amâs K ;
+Sup:emis K ;

LEXICON LEDE
+Inf:leđe K ;

! Present
+Prs+Sg1:lam K ;
+Prs+Sg2:lah K ;
+Prs+Sg3:lii K ;
+Prs+Du1:leen K ;
+Prs+Du1:laan K ;
+Prs+Du1:láán K ;
+Prs+Du2:leppee K ;
+Prs+Du3:lava K ;
+Prs+Du3:lává K ;
+Prs+Pl1:lep K ;
+Prs+Pl2:leppeđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:laa K ;
+Prs+Pl3:láá K ;

! Past
+Prt+Sg1:lijjim K ;
+Prt+Sg2:lijjih K ;
+Prt+Sg3:lai K ;
+Prt+Sg3:lei K ;
+Prt+Du1:láim K ;
+Prt+Du1:lááim K ;
+Prt+Du1:leim K ;
+Prt+Du2:láid K ;
+Prt+Du2:lááid K ;
+Prt+Du2:leid K ;
+Prt+Du3:láin K ;
+Prt+Du3:lááin K ;
+Prt+Du3:lein K ;
+Prt+Pl1:leim K ;
+Prt+Pl2:leid K ;
+Prt+Pl3:lijjii K ;

! Conditional
+Cond+Prs:ličč ODD-II ;
+Cond+Prs:ličči ODD-II-DU ;

!Potential
+Pot+Prs:ležž POT-I ;


! Person suffixes

LEXICON VSUF_SG1
+Sg1:%>m K ;

LEXICON VSUF_SG2
+Sg2:%>h K ;

LEXICON VSUF_SG3
+Sg3:%> K ;

LEXICON VSUF_DU1
+Du1:%>n K ;

LEXICON VSUF_DU2
+Du2:%>vettee K ;

LEXICON VSUF_DU3
+Du3:%>v K ;

LEXICON VSUF_PL1
+Pl1:%>p K ;

LEXICON VSUF_PL2
+Pl2:%>vetteđ K ;

LEXICON VSUF_PL3
+Pl3:%>h K ;




! Sublexica for possessive suffixes
! =================================


LEXICON K
        # ; ! clitic-less forms
+Qst:uv # ;
+Foc:gân # ;
+Foc:gâs # ;
+Foc:ges # ;
+Foc:gis # ;
+Foc:gin # ;
